Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
17-26-118. Criminal justice data collection - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Average daily population" means the number of confined inmates each day for a year, divided by the number of days in the year.

"Case disposition" means the final judgment, adjudication, adjudication withheld, dismissal, or nolle prosequi of a case.

"Confined inmate" means an inmate under the supervision of a jail facility, including an inmate who is in transit to or from a facility, appearing in or in transit to or from court, held for other jurisdictions, in a hospital or other medical institution for treatment but would otherwise be housed in the jail facility, in a work release program but returns to jail at night, or in a community-based program but returns to jail at night. "Confined inmate" does not include a person who is absent without leave, has escaped, is on long-term transfer to other jurisdictions, or is in a community-based program but does not return to jail at night.

"Hold" means a mechanism preventing a confined inmate's release from custody on bail, including a hold on behalf of another criminal justice agency, a parole hold, and a probation hold.

"Homeless" means an individual who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. An individual is considered homeless if the individual's primary address is recorded as:

Transient;

A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, including welfare hotels, congregate shelters, and transitional housing for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders; or

A public or private place not designed for, nor ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings, including but not limited to an automobile, a park, an abandoned building, a bus or train station, or a similar setting.

"Jail facility" means any building, structure, enclosure, institution, or place, whether permanent or temporary, fixed or mobile, where persons are or may be lawfully held in custody or confined, that is operated by a county or city and county.

"Jail management system" means a software program utilized by a jail facility to store jail data and to track inmate information and status beginning at booking and until release.

"Length of stay" means the number of consecutive days that a confined inmate spends in jail, from the date of booking to the date of release, counting any part of one calendar day, including days during which the inmate spends part of the day outside of the jail, as one day.

"Municipal offense" means a violation of, or conduct defined as unlawful by, any municipal code or ordinance.

"Operational capacity" means the number of inmates who can be accommodated in a jail facility based on the number of permanent beds that the facility is designed to hold and the facility's staff, existing programs, and services.

"Sentenced inmate" means an inmate who is confined and actively serving a sentence requiring a term of imprisonment. An inmate is considered sentenced even if the inmate is unsentenced in a separate case, and even if the inmate has a hold.

"Snapshot" means a data set from a jail facility that represents the required data points as of the reporting date.

"Unsentenced inmate" means an inmate who is confined and awaiting case disposition. An inmate is not considered unsentenced if the inmate is actively serving a sentence requiring a term of imprisonment in a separate case.

The keeper of each jail facility shall keep and maintain a daily record of all data specified in subsection (3) of this section. The information contained in the record must be available to the public at all reasonable hours.

The keeper of each jail facility shall keep and maintain a daily record of the following data:

For each confined inmate, the date of entrance; name; date of birth; age; race; ethnicity; gender; any criminal charges against the inmate, organized by code section, and the jurisdiction charging each offense; term of sentence, if sentenced; bond amount, if bond has been set; and release date;

The operational capacity of the jail facility;

The name of the jail management system used by the facility;

The number of confined inmates in the jail facility;

Counting each confined inmate only once, the following information concerning confined inmates:

The number of sentenced inmates;

The number of unsentenced inmates with a hold; and

The number of unsentenced inmates without a hold;

Counting each unsentenced inmate without a hold only once, the following information concerning unsentenced inmates:

The number whose most serious charged offense is a felony; and

The number whose most serious charged offense is a misdemeanor;

The number of confined inmates held solely for a municipal offense;

The number of confined inmates held in administrative segregation or other custody level in which the inmate is allowed outside of his or her cell for two or fewer hours per day;

The number of confined inmates awaiting a competency evaluation, as defined in section 16-8.5-101 (2); a competency hearing, as defined in section 16-8.5-101 (4); or a restoration hearing, as defined in section 16-8.5-101 (17);

The average daily population of the jail facility;

The average length of stay for each of the following:

Confined inmates who were released within the prior twelve months whose most serious offense is a felony; and

Confined inmates who were released within the prior twelve months whose most serious offense is a misdemeanor;

The number of confined inmates identified as homeless;

The number of deaths of confined inmates; and

The number of bookings into the jail facility.

On or before the third Friday of each January, April, July, and October, each jail facility shall submit a quarterly report of the data collected pursuant to subsection (3) of this section as of the first day of the month in which the report is submitted to the division of criminal justice within the department of public safety via an electronic survey designed by the division for that purpose. Each quarterly report must include:

A snapshot of the data required by subsections (3)(b) and (3)(c) of this section;

A snapshot of the data required by subsections (3)(d) to (3)(l) of this section organized by race, ethnicity, and gender;

Data concerning the number of deaths of confined inmates, collected pursuant to subsection (3)(m) of this section, as the total of all deaths of confined inmates that occurred since the previous reporting date; and

Data concerning the number of bookings into the jail facility, collected pursuant to subsection (3)(n) of this section, as the total of all bookings into the jail facility that occurred since the previous reporting date.

If a jail facility is unable to provide any of the data that it is required to report pursuant to this subsection (4), the jail facility shall include in its report an explanation of all good faith efforts to collect and submit the data not included in the report.

If a jail facility fails to submit a quarterly report pursuant to this subsection (4) within thirty days after a reporting date, the jail facility is considered noncompliant for the quarterly reporting period. The executive director of the department of public safety shall send notice of the failure to the noncompliant jail facility.

Repealed.

In addition to the information described in subsection (4)(a) of this section, the report must include information from the prior quarter regarding the number of inmates in the jail whose medicaid was suspended while incarcerated and the number of inmates who were enrolled, or whose medicaid was reinstated, prior to release.

On or before January 1, 2022, and on or before the third Friday of each January, April, July, and October thereafter, the keeper of each local jail shall submit a quarterly report of the data specified in this subsection (5) to the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety through an electronic form designed by the division. Each quarterly report must include:

For each individual placed in restrictive housing as defined in section 17-26-302 (4), anonymized data by month that includes:

The individual's self-identified race or ethnicity, gender, and age;

Whether the individual has one of the conditions identified in section 17-26-303 (1) and the specific condition;

The placement classification of the individual before being placed in restrictive housing;

The length of time the individual was in restrictive housing;

If the individual was placed in restrictive housing for a disciplinary reason;

Whether the individual suffered injury or death while placed in restrictive housing and the manner and cause of the injury or death;

Whether the individual was charged with a new criminal offense while in restrictive housing and, if so, the offense; and

How many times the local jail sought a written order to hold someone beyond fifteen days in restrictive housing and the outcome;

How many individuals in the local jail population have:

An identified mental illness;

An identified substance use disorder;

Both an identified mental illness and substance use disorder;

Identified neurocognitive issues such as dementia or traumatic brain injury; and

Engaged in self-harming behavior while in the local jail.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 938, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 19-1297), ch. 394, p. 3505, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(3)(i) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1047, § 31, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(5) added, (HB 21-1211), ch. 322, p. 1981, § 2, effective January 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(4)(e) added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1293, § 9, effective May 19; (3)(a) and IP(4)(a) amended and (4)(d) repealed, (HB 22-1208), ch. 125, p. 885, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-118 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-196, see section 1 of chapter 193, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

17-26-118.5. Prevention of erroneous payments to prisoners - identifying information reporting system.

In order to eliminate erroneous payments of benefits to persons confined in local jails in the state, county sheriffs, the state department of human services, county departments of human or social services, and the department of labor and employment shall cooperatively develop a system for reporting identifying information about persons confined in local jails for a period exceeding thirty days to state and county agencies responsible for the administration of workers' compensation and public assistance benefits. Such a system must be implemented on or before July 1, 2000, within existing appropriations.

On and after the implementation date of the information reporting system developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, but in any event no later than July 1, 2000, each sheriff in the state shall periodically transmit identifying information about each person confined for a period exceeding thirty days in any local jail within the sheriff's jurisdiction to the state department of human services, county departments of human or social services, and the department of labor and employment.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 552, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 405, § 23, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

17-26-119. Jail in another county - costs.

When there is no sufficient jail in any county wherein any criminal offense has been committed, any county or district judge, upon application of the sheriff, may order any person charged with any criminal offense and ordered to be committed to jail to be sent to the jail of the county nearest having a sufficient jail. The sheriff of such nearest county, on exhibit of the order of such judge, shall receive and keep in safe custody in the jail of his county the person ordered to be so committed. Such sheriff, upon the order of the district court thereof, shall redeliver such person when demanded, and all the expenses of keeping such person shall be paid by the county from which such person was sent. The board of county commissioners of the county from which any prisoner is sent, at the next regular meeting after receiving the bill for the expenses of such maintenance, safekeeping, and custody, shall audit and allow the claim and pay the same to the treasurer of the county in which such jail is situated for the use of such county.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 938, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-119 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-120. Keeping of fugitives - charges.

Any county jail may be used for the detention and safekeeping of any fugitive from justice from another state or territory, and in this case the county shall be entitled to compensation at the rate prescribed by the board of county commissioners. The rate so charged for the maintenance and safekeeping of such fugitive in custody shall be subject to the approval of the district judge, to be paid by the officer demanding the custody of such fugitive to the sheriff of the county and by him paid over to the treasurer of the county for the use of the county.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 938, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-120 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the authority of a person executing a governor's warrant to confine a prisoner in a county jail, see § 16-19-113.

17-26-121. Juveniles - confinement - when.

A jail shall not receive a juvenile for confinement unless the juvenile has been charged by the direct filing of an information in the district court or by indictment pursuant to section 19-2.5-801 or the juvenile has been ordered by the court to be held for criminal proceedings pursuant to section 19-2.5-802.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1042, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 19, effective October 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1017, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1690, § 21, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 717, § 36, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-121 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-122. Guards - compensation.

When the safekeeping and detention of persons lawfully committed to any jail in this state, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners, requires the employment of one or more guards, the board of county commissioners of the county where such jail is situated shall authorize the sheriff of such county to employ such guards at the expense of the county, at such reasonable compensation as the board shall allow, which guards shall be under the command of the keeper of the jail. Such guards shall be discharged from service when in the judgment of the board of county commissioners their services are not required.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-122 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-123. Federal prisoners - expense.

It is the duty of the keeper of each county jail to receive into the jail every person duly committed thereto for any offense against the United States, by any court or officer of the United States, and to confine every such person in the jail until he is duly discharged, the United States paying all the expenses of the confinement, safekeeping, and custody of such person, including the keeper's fees, at the rate established by the board of county commissioners of the county where such jail is situated.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-123 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-124. Charges for foreign prisoners.

It is the duty of the board of county commissioners of each county having a jail in this state to establish a rate of charges to be paid for the confinement, safekeeping, and maintenance of prisoners sent from other counties in this state, fugitives from justice, and persons committed by authority of the United States, which rate of charges may be altered, changed, or modified by the board of county commissioners of such county when in their judgment it seems best to do so. The rate so charged shall be subject to the approval of the district court of such county.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-124 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-125. Account of moneys - report.

It is the duty of the keeper of every jail within this state to keep an accurate account of all moneys received by him on account of the confinement, safekeeping, and maintenance of persons committed from other counties, fugitives from justice, and prisoners committed to the jail by authority of the United States, to report the same monthly to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein such jail is situated, and to pay over to the treasurer of such county monthly all such moneys for the use of such county.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-125 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-126. Commissioners to examine jail.

It is the duty of the board of county commissioners, as often as they deem necessary, but at least once annually, to make personal examination of the jail of its county, its sufficiency, and the management thereof and to correct all irregularities and improprieties therein found.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 926, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-126 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For governmental immunity provisions relating to jails and the conditions thereof, see § 24-10-106 (1)(b).

17-26-127. Escape - duty of sheriff - expenses.

In case of escape of any person lawfully committed to any jail of any county in this state, it is the duty of the sheriff of the county where such jail is situated to pursue and recapture such escaped person at the expense of the office of such sheriff. In case of any escape without any fault or negligence on the part of the keeper of the jail or the guards under such keeper's command, the board of county commissioners of the county where such jail is situated may audit and allow to the office of the sheriff the necessary expenses incurred in such recapture.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 939, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 401, § 10, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-127 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-26-128. Employment of county prisoners. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 940, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 84:

(1.3) added, p. 498, § 3, effective April 5.

L. 87:

(1)(d), (1)(e), (4), and (6) amended and (1)(f), (1.1), (5)(b.3), and (11) added, pp. 666, 667, §§ 1-3, effective May 16.

L. 88:

(1.1) R&RE, p. 709, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(e), (1)(f), and (1.1) amended and (1)(g) and (12) added, pp. 69, 70, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(11) amended, p. 2041, § 22, effective July 1; (12) amended, p. 1050, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 121, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(5) amended, p. 1048, § 11, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

17-26-129. Applicability of provisions.

The provisions of sections 17-26-107 and 17-26-108 shall not be applicable to any prisoner who is employed or detained outside of the jail under the provisions of section 18-1.3-106, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 941, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 667, § 4, effective May 16.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 167, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-26-129 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-26-130. Jail - pilot project authorized. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 759, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 556, § 6, effective April 24.

17-26-131. Joint jail commission authorized. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 759, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 557, § 7, effective April 24.

17-26-132. Joint jail commission - powers and duties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 759, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 557, § 8, effective April 24.

17-26-133. Contract provisions - approval by the division of criminal justice. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 760, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 557, § 9, effective April 24.

17-26-134. Jail inspection. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 761, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 559, § 10, effective April 24.

17-26-135. Project shall comply with provisions pertaining to intergovernmental relationships. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 761, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 559, § 11, effective April 24.

17-26-136. Termination of pilot project. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 761, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 559, § 12, effective April 24.

17-26-137. County jail assistance fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 924, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1369), ch. 379, p. 1951, § 5, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2017. (See L. 2017, p. 1951.)

17-26-138. Benefits assistance - legislative declaration - demonstration grant program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 906, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-209), ch. 23, p. 109, § 1, effective March 18.

17-26-139. County jail identification processing unit - personnel authority - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-006), ch. 403, p. 2219, § 3, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

The revisor of statutes did not receive the notice specified in §

42-2-311

by June 30, 2012; therefore, this section is repealed as provided in subsection (2) of this section, effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2009, p. 2219.)

17-26-140. Continuity of care for persons released from jail.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] If a person is treated for a substance use disorder throughout the person's incarceration, the county jail shall, at a minimum, conduct the following before releasing the person from the county jail's custody:

Provide post-release resources developed pursuant to section 17-1-103 (1)(r) to the person; and

Provide a list of available substance use providers, to the extent the behavioral health administration in the department of human services has such a list available.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

If a person is treated for a substance use disorder at any time during the person's incarceration, the county jail shall, at a minimum, conduct the following before releasing the person from the county jail's custody:

(a) Provide post-release resources developed pursuant to section 17-1-103 (1)(r) to the person;

(b) Provide a list of available substance use providers, to the extent the administration in the department of human services has such a list available;

If the person received or has been assessed to receive medication-assisted treatment while in jail, has a history of substance use in the community or while in jail, or requests opiate antagonists upon release, provide the person, upon release from the jail, at least eight milligrams of an opiate antagonist via inhalation or its equivalent and provide education to the person about the appropriate use of the medication;

If the person received medication-assisted treatment while in jail, has a history of substance use, or requests opiate use-disorder medication, prescribe to the person, upon release from the jail, medication for an opiate use disorder and provide education to the person about the appropriate use of the medication; and

Coordinate continued care for the person, including scheduling an appointment for the person with a substance use provider with the ability to continue the person's treatment, provide the person with detailed information about the scheduled appointment, provide the person with a prescription for the medication that the person was taking while in custody at the facility in an amount that is at least sufficient to sustain the person until the scheduled appointment, and provide the person with a referral to the care coordination infrastructure described in section 27-60-204.

A county jail shall provide medicaid enrollment or reenrollment paperwork to a person who is incarcerated in the jail and is eligible for medicaid benefits when the person enters the county jail. The county jail must file the medicaid paperwork with the county department of health and human services upon releasing the person from the county jail's custody.

As used in this section, "opiate antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any similarly acting drug that is not a controlled substance and that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of a drug overdose.

Notwithstanding any requirement of this section, a county jail shall not delay a person's release from the county jail because the jail cannot timely comply with a requirement of this section.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1425, § 6, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1293, § 10, effective May 19; (1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1495, § 22, effective July 1; (1) amended and (3) and (4) added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1642, § 16, effective January 1, 2023.